District of Columbia statutes.
42-3307

Regulations.

The Public Service Commission shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Such regulations shall include, but not be limited to, establishing procedures by which the company shall notify tenants of an affected apartment house that monies are owed the company.

Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-94, § 8, 27 DCR 3500
1981 Ed., § 43-547.